Arkansas, session 2025, HB1241.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 20, Chapter 77, Subchapter 1, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
20-77-154. High complexity oral health care — Reimbursement —
Definitions.
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Healthcare provider" means:
(A) An oral maxillofacial surgeon;
(B) A dentist;
(C) A dental specialist such as a endodontist,
orthodontist, periodontist, or prosthodontist;
(D) An anesthesiologist or other anesthesia provider;
(E) A pediatric dentist; or
(F) Support staff for an oral maxillofacial surgeon,
dentist, specialty dentist, pediatric dentist, or anesthesiologist, or other
anesthesia provider;
*JMB102*
03-19-2025 14:43:41 JMB102

As Engrossed: H2/10/25 H3/19/25 HB1241
(2) "High complexity oral health care" means any oral health
care that is complicated due to:
(A) A craniofacial condition as diagnosed by a plastic
surgeon, oral and maxillofacial surgeon, otolaryngologist, or geneticist who
is a member of a nationally approved cleft-craniofacial team of the American
Cleft Palate-Craniofacial Association and has evaluated the patient; or
(B) An intellectual or developmental disability; and
(3) “Intellectual or developmental disability” means the same as
defined in § 20-48-202.
(b)(1) The Arkansas Medicaid Program shall reimburse the dental
schools who are accredited by the Commission on Dental Accreditation and
academic medical centers for dental and anesthesia costs not to exceed three
thousand seven hundred fifty dollars ($3,750) per episode of care for
individuals with high complexity oral health care who are eighteen (18) years
of age or older and who require sedation dentistry with an annual cap per
individual of five thousand dollars ($5,000).
(2) The dental and anesthesia costs under subdivision (b)(1) of
this section:
(A) Shall only be reflective of professional fees and
supply costs; and
(B) Shall not include discounts or rebates received by the
dental schools who are accredited by the Commission on Dental Accreditation
and academic medical centers.
(3) The dental and anesthesia costs under subdivision (b)(1) of
this section that exceed the annual cap of five thousand dollars ($5,000) may
be approved by the Department of Human Services through a request for an
extension of benefits.
(c) The department shall apply for any federal waiver, Medicaid state
plan amendment, or other authorization necessary to implement this section.

/s/J. Mayberry





03-19-2025 14:43:41 JMB102